Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 5. Dental Assistants

§ 641.
Registration.

No person shall practice as a dental assistant in this State unless registered for that purpose by the Board.

On a form prepared and provided by the Board, each applicant shall state, under oath, that the dental assistant shall practice only under the supervision of a dentist.

The supervising dentist shall be responsible for the professional acts of dental assistants under his or her supervision.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 116

(Adj. Sess.), § 13.

§ 642.
Practice.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, a dental assistant may perform duties in the office of any licensed dentist consistent with rules adopted by the Board and in public or private schools or institutions under the supervision of a licensed dentist or other dentist approved for the purpose by the Board. The performance of any intraoral tasks shall be under the direct supervision of a dentist.

The following tasks may not be assigned to a dental assistant:

Diagnosis, treatment planning, and prescribing, including for drugs and medicaments or authorization for restorative, prosthodontic, or orthodontic appliances; or

Surgical procedures on hard or soft tissues within the oral cavity or any other intraoral procedure that contributes to or results in an irremediable alteration of the oral anatomy.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 116

(Adj. Sess.), § 13.